New York, session 2025-2026, A8959.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The section heading and subdivision 1 of section 1286 of 2 the vehicle and traffic law, as added by section 10 of part XX of chap- 3 ter 58 of the laws of 2020, are amended to read as follows: 4 Operators and passengers to wear protective headgear. 1. No person 5 under the age of sixteen [or seventeen years of age] shall ride upon, 6 propel or otherwise operate an electric scooter, electric personal 7 assistive mobility device, or bicycle with electric assist or be a 8 passenger on such electric scooter, electric personal assistive mobility 9 device, or bicycle with electric assist unless such person is wearing a 10 helmet meeting standards established by the commissioner pursuant to the 11 provisions of subdivision two-a of section twelve hundred thirty-eight 12 of this title. As used in this subdivision, wearing a helmet means 13 having a properly fitting helmet fixed securely on the head of such 14 wearer with the helmet straps securely fastened. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 16 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13588-01-5